Indiana, session 2026, HB1054.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 25-28.5-1-2, AS AMENDED BY P.L.1-2006,
SECTION 469, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 2. As used in this chapter:
(1) "Plumbing" means the practice of and the materials and
fixtures used in the installation, maintenance, extension, and
alteration of all piping, fixtures, appliances, and appurtenances in
connection with any of the following:
(A) Sanitary drainage or storm drainage facilities, the venting
system, and the public or private water supply systems, within
or adjacent to any building or structure.
(B) The practice and materials used in the installation,
maintenance, extension, or alteration of the stormwater, liquid
waste, or sewerage, and water supply systems of any premises
to the private property line or to their connection with any
point of public disposal or other acceptable terminal.
The term does not include the planning, designing, and
installation of sanitation and water systems in vehicles commonly
2026 IN 1054—LS 6419/DI 153


known as mobile homes, the drilling of wells, the installation of
pumps, pressure tanks, and piping incidental to the drilling or
repair of a well system, the sale or installation of water softening
equipment and apparatuses and services of the same, or the
business of manufacturing or selling plumbing fixtures;
appliances, equipment, or hardware; the installation of automatic
sprinklers, the overhead or underground water supplies or
standpipes when connected to an automatic sprinkler system or to
their related devices or appurtenances connecting thereto; nor
does the term include the work referred to in section 32(i) of this
chapter; nor does the term include the planning or design of water
supply or sewage systems which would ordinarily be performed
as "the practice of engineering", as defined in IC 25-31-1, or the
"practice of architecture", as defined in IC 25-4-1.
(2) "Plumbing contractor" means any person who, for
compensation, undertakes to, or submits a bid to, or does himself
or herself or by others, construct, repair, alter, remodel, add to,
subtract from, or improve plumbing and who is responsible for
substantially all the plumbing within the entire project, or one
who fabricates units or plumbing substantially completed and
ready for installation.
(3) "Journeyman plumber" means a person who engages or offers
to engage in, as an occupation or trade, the construction,
installation, alteration, maintenance, repair, remodeling, or
removal and replacement of plumbing under the supervision,
direction, and responsibility of a licensed plumbing contractor.
(4) "Maintenance man" means a person who is employed on a
permanent basis to keep the premises of a business establishment
in good repair.
(5) "Contracting" means, except as exempted in this chapter,
engaging in a business as a contractor.
(6) "Person" means a natural person, except in the case of a
plumbing contractor, in which case it may mean the partners or
members of a partnership, limited partnership, or any form of
unincorporated enterprise, owned by two (2) or more persons, and
as applied to "corporation" in addition to the corporate entity
means the officers or directors and employees thereof.
(7) "Commission" means the Indiana plumbing commission
created by this chapter.
(8) "License" means a certificate issued by the commission
established by this chapter which confers upon the holder the
privilege to act as a plumbing contractor or a journeyman plumber
2026 IN 1054—LS 6419/DI 153


as defined in this chapter.
(9) "Farmstead" means a farm dwelling together with other
buildings, structures, equipment, piping, and other plumbing
materials and supplies, located upon a parcel of real estate used
primarily for agricultural purposes located outside the corporate
limits of a municipality and not connected to a public water
supply.
(10) "Licensing agency" means the Indiana professional licensing
agency established under IC 25-1-5-3.
(11) "Apprentice plumber" means an individual who:
(A) is learning the plumbing trade; and
(B) is under the direction and immediate supervision of a
licensed plumbing contractor or a licensed journeyman
plumber.
(12) "Registration" means the granting of a certificate by the
commission that authorizes an individual to act as an apprentice
plumber.
(13) "Noncompete agreement" means a contract, or any part
of a contract, that has the purpose or effect of restricting or
penalizing a person's ability to engage in the plumbing trade
in any geographic area, for any period of time, after the
person's employment or contract with the employer has
ended. The term:
(A) includes:
(i) a nonsolicitation agreement; and
(ii) a training reimbursement agreement for persons not
in a registered apprentice program; and
(B) does not include:
(i) a nondislosure agreement protecting bona fide
confidential business information; or
(ii) a scholarship loan agreement for a person in a
commission approved apprenticeship program.
SECTION 2. IC 25-28.5-1-40 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 40. (a) A noncompete
agreement that is:
(1) entered into on or after April 1, 2026; and
(2) between:
(A) an employer (including a plumbing contractor, as
applicable); and
(B) a journeyman plumber, an apprentice plumber, a
pipefitter, a welder, an HVAC service technician, or any
2026 IN 1054—LS 6419/DI 153


person performing work that requires a license under this
article;
is void and unenforceable.
(b) This section shall be construed liberally to further the
policies of:
(1) promoting the mobility of journeymen plumbers,
apprentice plumbers, pipefitters, welders, HVAC service
technicians, or any person performing plumbing;
(2) fostering competition;
(3) protecting consumers; and
(4) ensuring that licensing does not become a barrier to
employment or the free exercise of the plumbing trade.
SECTION 3. An emergency is declared for this act.
2026 IN 1054—LS 6419/DI 153